Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.110

Actions limited to one year.

Within one year an action shall be brought against a sheriff, or other officer for the escape of a prisoner arrested or imprisoned on civil process.

[ 1985 c 11 s 2. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 1; Code 1881 s 30; 1877 p 8 s 30; 1869 p 9 s 30; 1854 p 364 s 5; RRS s 161.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: 1985 c 11 reenacted RCW 4.16.110 and 4.16.370 without amendment.

Short title—Application—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 and 11.02.901.

Purpose—1985 c 11: "The purpose of this act is to make technical corrections to chapter 149, Laws of 1984, and to ensure that the changes made in that chapter meet the constitutional requirements of Article II, section 19 of the state Constitution." [ 1985 c 11 s 1.]

Severability—1985 c 11: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1985 c 11 s 4.]

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.

Sheriff, civil liability: RCW 36.28.150.